California, session 20252026, AB2164.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 123469.5 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:123469.5. (a) The protections applicable to persons who engage in legally protected health care activity, as defined in Section 1798.300 of the Civil Code, shall also apply to a person who has previously undertaken one or more acts or omissions while in another United States jurisdiction to aid or encourage, or attempt to aid or encourage, any person in the exercise and enjoyment, or attempted exercise and enjoyment, of rights to reproductive health care services or gender affirming health care services that would have been protected by this state if they had been undertaken in this state, if the acts or omissions were permissible under the laws of the jurisdiction in which the person was located at the time of the acts or omissions.(b) “Reproductive health care services” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 1798.300 of the Civil Code.(c) “Gender affirming health care services” and “gender affirming mental health care services” have the same meanings as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 16010.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.SEC. 2. Section 1549.13 is added to the Penal Code, to read:1549.13. Except as required by federal law, Sections 1548.1 and 1548.2, no demand for the extradition of a person subject to criminal liability that is in whole or in part based on the alleged provision or receipt of, assistance in the provision or receipt of, material support for, or any theory of vicarious, joint, several, or conspiracy liability for any legally protected health care activity, as defined in Section 1549.15, shall be recognized by the Governor unless the executive authority of the demanding state alleges in writing that the accused was physically present in the demanding state at the time of the commission of the alleged crime, and that thereafter such accused fled from that state. Governor.